Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,189
Board; members; compensation; expenses.

Members of the board shall serve without compensation, except that they shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties pursuant to the Professional Landscape Architects Act as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1967, c. 565, § 6, p. 1862;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 183;

Laws 2012, LB1140, § 5;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 107.